District of Columbia statutes.
1-1213

Fees.

(a)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall adjust from time to time the schedule of fees to be charged by notaries public. The Mayor shall adjust the schedule by rule to provide fees in amounts which, in the Mayor’s judgment, will defray the notary public’s necessary expenses in connection with performing his services.

(b)

Until the schedule of fees is adjusted by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the schedule of fees in subsection (c) of this section will be in effect.

(c)

The fees of notaries public shall be:

(1)

For taking an acknowledgement of proof of a deed or other instrument including the seal and writing of the certificate, $2 for each signature;

(2)

For administering an oath or for taking an affidavit, including the jurat and seal, $2; or

(3)

For any other notarial act, $2.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 571
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-52, § 2, 30 DCR 5931
This section is referenced in § 1-1214.
1981 Ed., § 1-813.
1973 Ed., § 1-514.